District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.06

Minimum-service credit in cases of disability retirement.

In calculating, as provided in § 38-2001.05, the 3rd part of the annuity of a teacher retired under the provisions of § 38-2001.04, a minimum credit of 20 years shall be used in determining the sum allowable to a teacher with less than 20 years of service.

History

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 388, ch. 39, § 6
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 728, ch. 556, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1206.
1973 Ed., § 31-706.